Louisiana, session 2026, HB634.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The commissioner of administration, notwithstanding any other provision
of law to the contrary, is hereby authorized and empowered to convey, transfer, assign, lease,
or deliver any interest, excluding mineral rights, the state may have to all or any portion of
the following described property in St. Martin Parish to the Brownell Land Company, LLC:
Tract 1
Tax Parcel No. 2900001514: 76.00 AC: E/2 of the SE/4 or Lot 7 of SEC.
15, T15S-R13E
Tract 2
Tax Parcel No. 2900001521: 49.40 AC: W/2 of the SW/4 or Lot 2 of SEC.
14, T15S-R13
Section 2. The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized to enter into
such agreements, covenants, conditions, and stipulations and to execute such documents as
necessary to properly effectuate any conveyance, transfer, assignment, lease, or delivery of
title, excluding mineral rights, to the property described in Section 1 of this Act, and as more
specifically described in any such agreements entered into and documents executed by and
between the commissioner of administration and the Brownell Land Company, LLC, in
exchange of consideration proportionate to the appraised value of the property.
Page 1 of 2

HB NO. 634 ENROLLED
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2